Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5661YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2151 Section 1. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT 1 OF EDUCATION ââ THERAPEUTIC CLASSROOM INCENTIVE GRANT 2 PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 3 state to the department of education for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 5 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 6 purposes designated: 7 For deposit in the therapeutic classroom incentive fund 8 established pursuant to section 256.25: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 10